Utah statutes.
79-4-1001.   Purchase, trade, sale, or disposal of buffalo -- Proceeds.
(1)  In accordance with a plan, approved by the board, to manage buffalo herds
on Antelope Island, the division may purchase, trade, sell, or dispose of
buffalo obtained from Antelope Island through:
(a)  competitive bidding; or
(b)  a means as established by rule.
(2)  Proceeds received from the sale or disposal of buffalo under this section
shall be deposited as follows:
(a)  the first $75,000 shall accrue to the division for the management of
Antelope Island buffalo herds as dedicated credits; and
(b)  proceeds in excess of $75,000 shall be deposited in the State Park Fees
Restricted Account created under Section 79-4-402.
